Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4806
Law enforcement, court, and correctional personnel; veteran status; verification; training.

(1) Law enforcement, court, and correctional personnel shall verify the veteran status of any individual being processed through the criminal justice system in order to identify individuals who may be eligible for participation in a veteran justice program or for sentencing mitigation as provided in section 29-4805.

(2) Law enforcement, court, and correctional personnel shall receive training designed to increase their understanding of cases involving veterans, including veterans' exposure to violence and trauma. Such training shall include attention on issues that disproportionately impact female veterans, such as military sexual trauma.

Laws 2024, LB253, § 6.
Sections 29-4801 to 29-4807 apply on and after July 1, 2027.